Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-1201.13
Travel and Tourism
Division; duties; Travel and
Tourism Division Advisory Committee; members; duties; consultant; awarding
of contracts.

(1) The
Travel and Tourism Division shall develop a program to provide promotional
services and technical assistance to local governments and industry members
and to ensure the protection and development of Nebraska's attraction resources.

(2)(a) The department shall
have an advisory committee to provide regular consultation to the Travel and
Tourism Division, which committee
shall be named the Travel and Tourism Division Advisory Committee. Such advisory
committee shall include, at a minimum, one representative from the Game and
Parks Commission, one representative from the Nebraska Travel Association,
one representative from the Nebraska Hotel and Motel Association, one representative
from a tourism attraction that records at least two thousand out-of-state
visitors per year, and one representative from the Nebraska Association of
Convention and Visitors Bureaus.

(b) The Travel
and Tourism Division Advisory Committee shall develop a statewide strategic
plan to cultivate and promote tourism in Nebraska. The advisory committee
shall adopt policy criteria to be used in the development of the plan. The
plan shall include:

(i) A review of the existing and potential sources of funding for
tourism at the state and local levels;

(ii) A comprehensive inventory of local
tourism boards, the structure of such boards, and their funding;

(iii) Criteria
for local tourism boards in terms of appointments to such boards and for awarding
grants by such boards at the local level to ensure local resources are used
to achieve the greatest return;

(iv) An examination of other states' funding
models for tourism;

(v) Marketing strategies for promoting tourism;

(vi) A proposal
for creating new or expanding existing tourism capacity, which may include
encouraging regional cooperation, collaboration, or privatization; and

(vii) Recommended
legislation or funding requirements.

(c) The department may hire a consultant
to assist the Travel and Tourism Division Advisory Committee in developing
the statewide strategic plan. The department may accept, in trust, any gifts,
devises, and bequests to be held and administered by the department for the
purposes of hiring a consultant. The advisory committee shall prepare and
present the statewide strategic plan to the Legislature by September 1, 2012.

(3) All
advertising contracts awarded by the department concerning travel and tourism
shall be based on competitive bids. Contracts shall be awarded to the lowest
responsible bidder, taking into consideration the best interests of the state,
the quality of performance of the services rendered, the conformity with specifications,
the purposes for which required, and the time of completion, and with the
consultation of the Travel and Tourism Division Advisory Committee. In determining
the lowest responsible bidder, in addition to price, the following elements
shall be given consideration: (a) The ability, capacity,
creativity, and skill of the bidder to perform the contract required; (b) the character, integrity, reputation, judgment,
experience, and efficiency of the bidder; (c) whether the bidder can
perform the contract within the time specified; (d) the
quality of performance of previous contracts; (e) the
previous and existing compliance by the bidder with laws relating to the contract;
and (f) such other information
as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the contract.
The department shall advertise for bids for the awarding of contracts concerning
travel and tourism pursuant to sections 73-101 to 73-105. At least thirty
working days shall elapse between the time formal bids are advertised for
and the time of their opening. Contracts shall be awarded within sixty working
days after the bidding has been closed. Each person submitting a bid shall,
by certified mail, be notified as to whom the contract was awarded.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB684, § 1.
August 27, 2011